Mississippi statutes. Title 81. Banks and Financial Institutions
Chapter 12. Savings Associations Law
§ 81-12-135.
Savings accounts issued to minors or persons under disability; payment of withdrawals; powers of parent or guardian; withdrawals on death of holder.

An association and any federal association may issue savings accounts to any minor or other person under disability as the sole and absolute owner of such savings account, and receive payments thereon by or for such owner, and pay withdrawals, accept pledges to the association, and act in any other manner with respect to such accounts on the written instruction of such savings account holder in accord with this chapter. Any payment or delivery of rights to any minor or other person under a disability, or a receipt or acquittance signed by a minor or other person under a disability, who holds a savings account, shall be a valid and sufficient release of such association for any payment so made or delivery of rights to such minor or person. The receipt, acquittance, pledge or other action required by the association to be taken by such minor or person shall be binding upon such minor or person with like effect as if he were of full age and legal capacity. The parent or guardian of such minor or person shall not in his capacity as parent or guardian have the power to attach or in any manner to transfer any savings account issued to or in the name of such minor or person; provided, however, that in the event of the death of such minor or person the receipt or acquittance of either parent, a person standing in loco parentis, guardian or conservator of such minor or person shall be a valid and sufficient discharge of such association for any sum or sums not exceeding in the aggregate One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) unless the minor or person shall have given written notice to the association not to accept the signature of such person.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 445, § 35; Laws, 1982, chs. 301, § 68; 467, § 2; reenacted, Laws, 1990 Ex Sess, ch. 52, § 69; Laws, 1993, ch. 441, § 69; Laws, 1994, ch. 622, § 101; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 496, § 66; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 488, § 68, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-12-137.
Accounts in the name of two (2) or more persons.

Accounts may be in the name of two (2) or more persons, whether minor or adult, in such form that the monies in the accounts are payable to either, or the survivor or survivors, and such money due under such accounts and all additions thereto shall be the property of such persons as joint tenants with the right of survivorship. The monies due under such accounts may be paid to or on the order of any one (1) of such persons during his lifetime or to or on the order of any one (1) of the survivors of them after the death of any one or more of them. The opening of the account in such form shall be conclusive evidence as to the liability of the association only in any action or proceeding to which the association is a party, of the intention of all of the parties to the account to vest title to money due under the account and the additions thereto in such survivor or survivors. By written instructions given to the association by all the parties to the account, the signatures of more than one (1) of such persons during their lifetime or of more than one (1) of the survivors after the death of any one (1) of them may be required for withdrawal, in which case the association shall pay the monies in the account only in accordance with such instructions, but no such instructions shall limit the right of the survivor or survivors to receive the money in the account. By written agreement with the association, any person may create a joint account with other persons as joint tenants with the right of survivorship and said agreement may be signed only by the persons creating said account.

The association, unless instructed in writing to the contrary, may loan money to any one or more persons constituting a single membership or account as joint tenants with the right of survivorship, and any person authorized to make withdrawals as provided in this section may pledge, hypothecate or assign all or any part of the money due or to become due under such account. Any such pledge, hypothecation or assignment or any increase to or withdrawal from the account shall not destroy the joint tenancy with right of survivorship.

Payment of all or any of the monies in such account, as provided in this section, shall discharge the association from liability with respect to the monies so paid, prior to receipt by the association of a court order. After receipt of such court order, an association may refuse, without liability, to honor any withdrawal on the account pending determination of the rights of the parties. No association paying any survivor in accordance with the provisions of this section shall thereby be liable for any estate, inheritance or succession taxes which may be due this state.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 445, § 36; reenacted, Laws, 1982, ch. 301, § 69; Laws, 1990 Ex Sess, ch. 52, § 70; Laws, 1993, ch. 441, § 70; Laws, 1994, ch. 622, § 102; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 496, § 67; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 488, § 69, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-12-139.
Accounts of administrators, executors, guardians, trustees, and other fiduciaries.

Any association may accept accounts in the name of any administrator, executor, guardian, trustee or other fiduciary in trust for a named beneficiary or beneficiaries. Any such fiduciary shall have power to vote as a member as if any membership account were held absolutely, to make payments upon, and to withdraw any such account, in whole or in part. The withdrawal value of any such account, or other rights relating thereto may be paid or delivered, in whole or in part, to such fiduciary, without regard to any notice to the contrary, as long as such fiduciary is living. The payment or delivery to any such fiduciary or a receipt of acquittance signed by any such fiduciary to whom any such payment or any such delivery of rights is made shall be valid and sufficient release and discharge of any association for the payment or delivery so made. Whenever a person holding an account in a fiduciary capacity dies and no written notice of the revocation or termination of t he trust relationship shall have been given to an association and the association has no notice of any other disposition of the trust estate, the withdrawal value of such account, or other rights relating thereto may, at the option of an association, be paid or delivered, in whole or in part, to the beneficiary or beneficiaries of such trust. Whenever an account shall be opened by any person describing himself in opening such account as trustee for another and there is no other or further notice of the existence and terms of a legal and valid trust, then such description shall be given in writing to such association. In the event of the death of the person so described as trustee, the withdrawal value of such account or any part thereof may be paid to the person for whom the account was thus stated to have been opened, and such account and all additions thereto shall be the property of such person, unless prior to payment the trust agreement is presented to the association showing a contrary interest. When made in accord with this section, the payment or delivery to any such beneficiary, beneficiaries or designated person, or a receipt or acquittance signed by any such beneficiary, beneficiaries or designated person for any such payment or delivery shall be valid and sufficient release and discharge of an association for the payment or delivery so made. Trust accounts permitted by this chapter shall not be required to be acknowledged and recorded. When an account is opened in a form described in this section, the right set forth in Section 81-12-145 shall apply. No association paying any beneficiary in accordance with the provisions of this section shall thereby be liable for any estate, inheritance or succession taxes which may be due this state.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 445, § 37; reenacted, Laws, 1982, ch. 301, § 70; Laws, 1990 Ex Sess, ch. 52, § 71; Laws, 1993, ch. 441, § 71; Laws, 1994, ch. 622, § 103; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 496, § 68; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 488, § 70, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-12-141.
Accounts of deceased nonresidents.

When an account is held in any association by a person residing in another state or country, the account, or any part thereof not in excess of Two Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00), may be paid to the administrator or executor appointed in the state or country where the account holder resides at the time of death, provided such administrator or executor has furnished the association with (a) authenticated copies of his letters and of the order of the court which issued the letters to him authorizing him to collect, receive and remove the personal estate, and (b) an affidavit by the administrator or executor that to his knowledge no letters are then outstanding in this state and no petition for letters by an heir, legatee, devisee or creditor of the decedent is pending on the estate in this state, and that there are no creditors of the estate in this state. Upon payment or delivery to such representative after receipt of the affidavit and authenticated copies, the association is released and discharged to the same extent as if the payment or delivery had been made to a legally qualified resident executor or administrator, and is not required to see to the application or disposition of the property. No action at law or in equity shall be maintained against the association for payment made in accordance with the above provisions.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 445, § 38; Laws, 1980, ch. 426, § 2; reenacted, Laws, 1982, ch. 301, § 71; Laws, 1990 Ex Sess, ch. 52, § 72; Laws, 1993, ch. 441, § 72; Laws, 1994, ch. 622, § 104; enacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 496, § 69; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 488, § 71, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-12-143.
Payments to successors without administration.

Any association may pay to the successor of a deceased depositor, as defined in Section 91-7-322(2), without necessity of administration, any sum to the credit of the deceased not exceeding Twelve Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($12,500.00), upon affidavit that the deceased died leaving no last will and testament and bond signed by each of the successors guaranteeing payment of any lawful debts of the deceased to the extent of that withdrawal. The receipt of acquittance of the person or persons so paid shall be valid and sufficient release and discharge to the association as against all other persons and claimants for any payment so made; however, the bond shall be made available to any creditor for suit against the makers of the bond.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 445, § 39; Laws, 1980, ch. 426, § 2; reenacted, 1982, ch. 301, § 72; Laws, 1990 Ex Sess, ch. 52, § 73; Laws, 1993, ch. 441, § 73; Laws, 1994, ch. 622, § 105; Laws, 1995, ch. 380, § 2; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 496, § 70; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 458, § 2; Laws, 2003, ch. 394, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2003.

§ 81-12-145.
Accounts payable at death.

[Effective from and after January 1, 2020, this section will read as follows:]

Accounts payable at death may be established under the following conditions:

An account in an association may be opened by any person or persons with directions to make such an account payable on the death of the person or persons opening such an account to the named beneficiary or beneficiaries. When an account is so opened, the association shall pay any monies to the credit of the account from time to time to, or pursuant to the order of the person or persons opening such an account during his or their lifetime in the same manner as if the account were in the sole name or names of such person or persons.

If the named beneficiary or one (1) of the beneficiaries so named survive the death of the person opening such an account and the beneficiary or all of the beneficiaries so named are sixteen (16) years of age or over at the death of the person opening such an account, the association shall pay the monies to the credit of the account, less all proper setoffs and charges, to the named beneficiary or beneficiaries or upon his or their order, as hereinafter provided, and such payment by the association shall be valid, notwithstanding any lack of legal age of the named beneficiary or beneficiaries; provided, however, where such an account is opened or subsequently held by more than one (1) person, the death of one (1) of such persons shall not terminate the account and the account shall continue as to the surviving person or persons and the named beneficiary or beneficiaries subject to the provisions of subsections (c) through (i) of this section.

If the named beneficiary or all of the beneficiaries so named survive the death of the person or persons opening such an account and are under sixteen (16) years of age at such time, the association shall pay the monies to the credit of the account, less all proper setoffs and charges:

When or after the named beneficiary becomes sixteen (16) years of age, to the named beneficiary or upon his order; or

When more than one (1) beneficiary is named, the association shall pay to each beneficiary so named his proportionate interest in such account as each severally becomes sixteen (16) years of age; or

To the legal guardian of the named beneficiary, wherever appointed and qualified, or where more than one (1) beneficiary is named, the association shall pay such beneficiary’s proportionate interest in such account to his legal guardian wherever and whenever appointed and qualified; or

If no guardian is appointed and qualified, payment may be made in accordance with the provisions of Section 93-20-209 or 93-20-431 in situations to which such section or sections are applicable.

Where the death of the person or persons opening such an account terminates the account under the provisions of paragraphs (b) and (c) of this section and where one or more of the named beneficiaries are under sixteen (16) years of age and the remainder of the named beneficiaries are sixteen (16) years of age or over, the association shall pay the monies to the credit of the trust, less all proper setoffs and charges, to:

The named beneficiaries sixteen (16) years of age or over at the time of termination of said account pursuant to paragraph (b) of this section, and

The named beneficiaries under sixteen (16) years of age at the time of termination of said account pursuant to paragraph (c) of this section.

Where such account is opened or subsequently held by more than one (1) person, the association, in the absence of any written instructions to the contrary, consented to by the association, shall accept payments made to such account and may pay any monies to the credit of such account from time to time to, or pursuant to the order of, either or any of said persons during their life or lives in the same manner as if the account were in the sole name of either or any of such persons.

When a person or persons opens an account in an association, in the form set forth in paragraph (a) of this section, and makes a payment or payments to such account, or causes a payment or payments to be made to such account, such person or persons shall be conclusively presumed to intend to vest in the named beneficiary or beneficiaries a present beneficial interest in such payment so made, and in the monies to the credit of the account from time to time, to the end that, if the named beneficiary or beneficiaries survive the person or persons opening such an account, all the right and title of the person or persons opening such an account in and to the monies to the credit of the account at the death of such person or persons, less all proper setoffs and charges, shall, at such death, vest solely and indefeasibly in the named beneficiary or beneficiaries subject to the conditions and limitations of paragraphs (c) through (i) of this section.

If the named beneficiary predeceases the person opening such an account, the present beneficial interest presumed to be vested in the named beneficiary pursuant to paragraph (f) of this section shall terminate at the death of the named beneficiary. In such case, the personal representatives of the named beneficiary, and all others claiming through or under the named beneficiary, shall have no right in or title to the monies to the credit of the account, and the association shall pay such monies, less all proper setoffs and charges, to the person opening such an account, or pursuant to his order, in the same manner as if the account were in the sole name of the person opening such an account; provided, however, where such an account names more than one (1) beneficiary, the death of one (1) of the beneficiaries so named shall not terminate the account and the account shall continue as to the surviving beneficiary or beneficiaries subject to the provisions of paragraphs (c) through (i) of this section.

An association which makes any payment pursuant to paragraphs (c) through (g) of this section, prior to service upon the association or an order of court restraining such payment, shall, to the extent of each payment so made, be released from all claims of the person or persons opening such an account, the named beneficiary or beneficiaries, their legal representatives, and all others claiming through or under them.

When an account is opened in a form described in paragraph (a) of this section, the right of the named beneficiary or beneficiaries to be vested with sole and indefeasible title to the monies to the credit of the account on the death of the person or persons opening such an account shall not be denied, abridged or in anywise affected because such right has not been created by a writing executed in accordance with the law of this state prescribing the requirements to effect a valid testamentary disposition of property.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 445, § 40; reenacted, Laws, 1982, ch. 301, § 73; Laws, 1990 Ex Sess, ch. 52, § 74; Laws, 1993, ch. 441, § 74; Laws, 1994, ch. 622, § 106; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 496, § 71; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 488, § 73, eff from and after July 1, 2001; Laws, 2019, ch. 463, § 6, eff from and after January 1, 2020.

§ 81-12-147.
Savings accounts as legal investments and as security for bonds.

Administrators, executors, custodians, guardians, trustees, pension funds and other fiduciaries of every kind and nature, insurance companies, business and manufacturing companies, banks, credit unions and all other types of financial institutions, charitable, educational and eleemosynary institutions and organizations hereby are specifically authorized and empowered to invest funds held by them, without any order of any court, in savings accounts of associations which are under state supervision, and in accounts of insured associations, and such investments shall be deemed and held to be legal investments for such funds. With respect to investments by custodians, associations hereby are deemed to be qualified institutions within the meaning of that term as used in the Uniform Gifts to Minors Law of this state.

The provisions of this section are supplemental to any and all other laws relating to and declaring what shall be legal investments for the persons, fiduciaries, corporations, organizations and officials referred to in this section, and the laws relating to the deposit of securities and the making and filing of bonds for any purpose.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 445, § 41; reenacted, Laws, 1982, ch, 301, § 74; Laws, 1990 Ex Sess, ch. 52, § 75; Laws, 1993, ch. 441, § 75; Laws, 1994, ch. 622, § 107; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 496, § 72; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 488, § 74, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-12-149.
Payment of earnings on savings accounts.

An association may pay earnings on its savings accounts from sources available for payment of earnings at such rate and at such times and for such time or notice periods as shall be determined by resolution of its board of directors subject to such rules and regulations promulgated by the commissioner. Except for accounts which shall be classified according to a specified contractual time or notice period, earnings shall be declared on the withdrawal value of each savings account at the beginning of the accounting period, plus additions thereto made during the period (less amounts previously withdrawn and noticed for withdrawal, which for earnings purposes shall be deducted from the latest previous additions thereto) computed at the declared rate for the time the funds have been invested, which time shall be fixed by the bylaws of the association. No earnings shall be declared or paid for an accounting period unless the allocation to the general reserve for the pre ceding accounting period required herein has been made. The board of directors, by resolution, may determine that earnings shall not be paid on any savings account which has a withdrawal value of a specified amount less than Fifty Dollars ($50.00) or which by written agreement is intended to be closed within a specified period less than fifteen (15) months after the date on which such savings account is opened, provided that an exception may be made and earnings paid on savings accounts opened pursuant to Sections 81-12-129 and 81-12-131. The directors shall determine by resolution the method of calculating the amount of any earnings on savings accounts as herein provided, and the time or times when earnings are to be declared, paid or credited.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 445, § 42; reenacted, Laws, 1982, ch 301, § 75; Laws, 1990 Ex Sess, ch. 52, § 76; Laws, 1993, ch. 441, § 76; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1994, ch. 622, § 108; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 496, § 73; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 488, § 75, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-12-151.
Withdrawals by savings account holders.

Any savings account holder or other account holder or his authorized representative may at any time present a written application for withdrawal of all or any part of his savings account or other account. Every association shall pay, except as provided below, every withdrawal application in the amount stated thereon in the form of cash or one or more checks or similar instruments payable to the order of the account holder. However, if a federal savings and loan association located in this state acquires the right and power to pay withdrawal applications in the form of checks or similar instruments payable to the order of others than the account holder as directed, or by the transfer of credits to the account or accounts of others in an institution as directed, then an association incorporated pursuant to or operating under the provisions of this chapter may have and possess the same rights and powers if prescribed by the board pursuant to subsection (r) of Section 8 1-12-49. No withdrawal shall be made in excess of the withdrawal value of such savings account or accounts, together with any earnings which may have been declared and may have accrued thereon for the current period. The payment of withdrawals from savings accounts shall be subject to the right of the association to require notice not to exceed thirty (30) days and shall be subject to such rules and procedures as may be prescribed by regulations of the commissioner, but any association which, except as authorized in writing by the commissioner, fails to make full payment of any withdrawal when due shall be deemed to be in an impaired condition to transact business within the meaning of Section 81-12-183 of this chapter.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 445, § 43; 1980, ch. 449, § 61; reenacted, Laws, 1982, ch. 301, § 76; Laws, 1990 Ex Sess, ch. 52, § 77; Laws, 1993, ch. 441, § 77; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1994, ch. 622, § 109; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 496, § 74; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 488, § 76, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-12-153.
Redemptions.

At any time funds are on hand for the purpose, the association shall have the right to redeem by lot as the board of directors may determine, all or any part of any of its savings accounts on an earnings date by giving thirty (30) days’ notice by registered mail addressed to each affected account holder at his last address as recorded on the books of the association. No association shall redeem any of its savings accounts when the association is in an impaired condition or when it is unable to pay its applications for withdrawal. The redemption price of savings accounts redeemed shall be the full value of the account redeemed, as determined by the board of directors, but in no event shall the redemption price be less than the withdrawal value. If the aforesaid notice of redemption shall have been duly given, and if on or before the redemption date the funds necessary for such redemption shall have been set aside so as to be and continue to be available therefor, earnings upon the accounts called for redemption shall cease to accrue from and after the earnings date specified as the redemption date; and all rights with respect to such accounts shall forthwith, after such redemption date, terminate, except only for the right of the account holder of record to receive the redemption price with interest to the redemption date. All savings account books or certificates evidencing former savings accounts which have been validly called for redemption must be tendered for payment within ten (10) years from the date of redemption designated in the redemption notice, otherwise they shall be cancelled. After the expiration of the period of ten (10) years, the association in which the funds are located shall, within six (6) months, pay the funds to the commissioner, who shall deposit such funds to the department’s account with the State Treasurer.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 44; reenacted, Laws, 1982, ch. 301, § 77; Laws, 1990 Ex Sess, ch. 52, § 78; Laws, 1993, ch. 441, § 78; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1994, ch. 622, § 110; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 496, § 75; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 488, § 77, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-12-155.
Securities in which associations may invest.

Associations shall have power to invest in securities as follows:

Without limit, in obligations of, or obligations which are fully guaranteed as to principal and interest by, the United States or this state; in stock or obligations of any federal home loan bank or banks; in stock or obligations of the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation; in stock or obligations of the Federal National Mortgage Association, the Government National Mortgage Association, Federal Home Loan Mortgage Corporation, or any successor or successors thereto; in demand, time, or savings deposits, accounts or other obligations of any financial institution the accounts of which are insured by a federal agency; in bankers’ acceptances which are eligible for purchase by Federal Reserve banks;

Not in excess of twenty-five percent (25%) of its assets in (i) bonds, notes or other evidences of indebtedness which are a general obligation of, or guaranteed as to principal and interest by, any agency or instrumentality of the United States not specified in subsection (a) or of this state, or any city, town, village, county, district or other municipal corporation or political subdivision of this state, or any public instrumentality or public authority of any one or more of the foregoing; (ii) capital stock, obligations, or other securities of service organizations, provided that the commissioner shall establish by regulation the permissible aggregate of such investments as a percentage of assets; and (iii) other stocks, securities and obligations which the board shall approve and place on a list to be published and distributed to every association from time to time, and the commissioner is directed to publish and make distribution of such a list. An association holding investments which are so listed by the commissioner shall have a reasonable time to dispose of the same if at a later time the commissioner shall remove such investments from the list.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 445, § 45; reenacted, Laws, 1982, ch. 301, § 78; Laws, 1990 Ex Sess, ch. 52, § 79; Laws, 1993, ch. 441, § 79; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1994, ch. 622, § 111; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 496, § 76; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 488, § 78, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-12-157.
Association may not invest in security or grant loan when liquid assets are less than five percent of savings liability.

No association shall invest in any security, other than those that qualify as liquid assets, or in any loan at any time when its liquid assets are less than five percent (5%) of its savings liability unless the commissioner shall after investigation have issued written approval.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 445, § 46; reenacted, Laws, 1982, ch. 301, § 79; Laws, 1990 Ex Sess, ch. 52, § 80; Laws, 1993, ch. 441, § 80; Laws, 1994, ch. 622, § 112; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 496, § 77; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 488, § 79, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-12-159.
Loans and other investments in which associations may invest.

Every association shall have power to invest in loans and other investments as follows:

Loans secured by its savings accounts to the extent of the withdrawal value thereof;

Real estate loans in any amount not exceeding the value of the security, subject to the following conditions:

No association shall make a real estate loan to one (1) borrower if the sum of (1) the amount of such loan, and (2) the total balances of all outstanding loans owed to such association by such borrower, excluding the amount of any loan on the security of a savings account, exceeds an amount equal to ten percent (10%) of such association’s savings liability or an amount equal to the sum of such association’s net worth except that any such loan may be made if the sum of (1) and (2) does not exceed One Hundred Thousand Dollars ($100,000.00);

An association may (1) participate with one or more financial institutions, or entities having a tax exemption under Section 501(a) of the Internal Revenue Code, in any real estate loan of the type in which such association is authorized to invest on its own account, provided that the participating interest of such association is not subordinated or inferior to any other participating interest; or (2) participate in such real estate loans with other than financial institutions or those entities described, provided that the participating interest of such association is superior to the participating interests of such other participants;

Such restrictions on real estate loans on real estate located outside the primary lending area of an association and on real estate loans as the commissioner may establish by regulation;

Such other restrictions as the commissioner may establish;

Loans secured by the pledge of loans or investments, the assignment of which need not be recorded, of a type in which the association is authorized to invest, provided that the loans and investments so pledged shall be subject to all restrictions and requirements which would be applicable were the association to invest directly in such loans or investments;

Loans secured by the pledge of policies of life insurance, the assignment of which is properly acknowledged by the insured, but not exceeding the cash value of such policies;

Property improvement loans made pursuant to the provisions of any title of the National Housing Act or subject to any limitation as to maximum loan amount prescribed by the commissioner for all associations, loans to homeowners and other property owners for the construction, maintenance, repair, alteration, modernization, landscaping, improvement, furnishing or equipping of properties pursuant to rules and regulations prescribed by the commissioner;

Loans made for the purpose of mobile home financing, subject to any limitation as to maximum loan amount which may be prescribed by the commissioner for all associations. For the purpose of this subsection, “mobile home” shall mean a movable accommodation used or designed for use as living quarters;

Such real property or interests therein, including real estate for home or branch offices, as the directors may deem necessary or convenient for the conduct of the business of the association, which for the purposes of this chapter shall be deemed to include the ownership of stock of a wholly owned subsidiary corporation having as its exclusive activity the ownership and management of such property or interests, but the amount so invested shall not exceed the net worth of the association, provided that the commissioner may authorize a greater amount to be so invested.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 445, § 47; Laws, 1982, chs. 301, § 80; 467, § 3; Laws, 1990 Ex Sess, ch. 52, § 81; Laws, 1993, ch. 441, § 81; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1994, ch. 622, § 113; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 496, § 78; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 488, § 80, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-12-161.
Real estate loans to be written on approved loan plans.

Real estate loans eligible for investment by an association under this chapter shall be written upon loan plans approved by the commissioner, which shall include provisions for appraisals, payments, evidences of the loans, and security instruments, and may include provisions concerning liens, payments of taxes and insurance premiums and similar charges, and advance payments of taxes and insurance premiums and similar charges.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 445, § 48; reenacted, Laws, 1982, ch. 301, § 81; Laws, 1990 Ex Sess, ch. 52, § 82; Laws, 1993, ch. 441, § 82; reenacted and amended, 1994, ch. 622, § 114; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 496, § 79; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 488, § 81, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-12-163.
Borrower’s right to select attorney and obtain insurance in connection with loan; rules and regulations governing fire, casualty and title insurance.

In connection with a loan, the borrower may be required to pay an attorney of his choice for services performed in connection with the loan; the borrower shall not be required to pay any attorney’s fee to any attorney not selected by the borrower; and the borrower shall have the right to obtain at his own expense, if such insurance would be required by the lender, fire and casualty insurance on the property offered as security, or credit life insurance, from an insurance agent of the borrower’s choice. The commissioner is empowered to promulgate rules and regulations governing the filing and maintenance by the borrower with the association of fire and casualty insurance on the property offered as security, and title insurance. But the commissioner shall not authorize title insurance in any company that is not authorized to do business in the State of Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 445, § 49(1); reenacted, Laws, 1982, ch. 301, § 82; Laws, 1990 Ex Sess, ch. 52, § 83; Laws, 1993, ch. 441, § 83; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1994, ch. 622, § 115; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 496, § 80; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 488, § 82, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-12-165.
Payment of expenses in connection with closing of loan; borrower to pay only his own attorney’s fee; notice of right to select attorney; right of association to require title insurance.

Every association may require borrowers to pay all reasonable expenses incurred in connection with the making, closing, disbursing, extending, readjusting or renewing of real estate loans as shall be authorized by the commissioner. If an attorney’s fee is charged the borrower in connection with any loan, the borrower shall have the right to select an attorney of his choice to close the loan and to look after his interests in connection with the loan and the fee shall be paid to the attorney selected. It is the intention of the Legislature to insure that the borrower shall not be required to pay any attorney’s fee to any attorney other than the attorney selected by the borrower to close the loan. The borrower shall be advised by the association in writing of his right to select an attorney, provided that such attorney is on an approved list of a title insurance company acceptable to the association, and authorized to do business in the State of Mississippi. Title insurance is used herein as a criterion for qualifications of attorneys only, and nothing in this chapter shall be construed as requiring any association to require a borrower to secure a title insurance policy in addition to the regular attorney’s certification of title. However, an association may, if it desires, require title insurance policies on loans, but if policies are required from one (1) attorney they shall be required from all attorneys used in connection with loans under this section. No association shall discriminate as to any charges, fees or discounts, or make any different charges whatsoever between loans closed by an attorney selected or recommended by, or representing the association and loans closed by an attorney selected by the borrower under the provisions of this subsection. It is the intent of the Legislature that borrowers shall be free to select attorneys of their choice to close all loans under the authority of this paragraph, without incurring any additional charge or expense whatsoever. The commissioner shall have the authority to adopt reasonable rules and regulations to promulgate the provisions of this subsection. Any association, or any officer or employee of any such association willfully violating the provisions of this subsection shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be fined not less than One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) nor more than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00).

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 445, § 49(2); reenacted, Laws, 1982, ch. 301, § 83; Laws, 1990 Ex Sess, ch. 52, § 84; Laws, 1993, ch. 441, § 84; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1994, ch. 622, § 116; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 496, § 81; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 488, § 83, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-12-167.
Late payment charges.

A late payment charge, not exceeding Five Dollars ($5.00) or four percent (4%) of the amount of any delinquency, whichever is greater, if contracted for, shall not be considered interest under the usury laws. However, no such charge shall be made unless such delinquency is more than fifteen (15) days past due.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 445, § 49(3); Laws, 1981, ch. 336, § 1; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1982, ch. 301, § 84; reenacted, 1990 Ex Sess, ch. 52, § 85; Laws, 1993, ch. 441, § 85; Laws, 1994, ch. 622, § 117; Laws, 1996, ch. 400, § 24; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 496, § 82; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 488, § 84, eff from and after July 1, 2001.